Washington statutes.
RCW 18.46.020

License required.

After July 1, 1951, no person shall operate a birthing center in this state without a license under this chapter.

[ 2000 c 93 s 31; 1951 c 168 s 3. Prior: 1943 c 214 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6130-48.]